Alaska, session 34, HB343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03.073(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) A school district shall provide an [THE] opportunity at least three times a 06 year, or upon the request of the student's parent or guardian, for a student 07 [STUDENTS] enrolled in grades nine through 12 in the district to challenge one or 08 more courses provided by the district by demonstrating mastery in mathematics, 09 language arts, science, social studies, and world languages at the level of the course 10 challenged. A school district shall give full credit for a course to a student who 11 successfully challenges that course as provided under this section. 12 * Sec. 2. AS 14.03.073(d) is amended to read: 13 (d) In this section, 14 (1) "guardian" has the meaning given in AS 13.06.050; 01 (2) "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. 02 * Sec. 3. AS 14.03.073 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 03 (e) A school district shall provide a student an opportunity to challenge 04 courses under (a) of this section within three weeks after the date the student begins 05 attending school in the district if 06 (1) a parent or guardian of the student serves as an active duty member 07 of the armed forces of the United States or a member of the National Guard; 08 (2) the parent or guardian is transferred under an official military order 09 to a military installation in the state from outside of the state; and 10 (3) the transfer results in the student's enrollment in the school district. 11 (f) Not later than the end of the first business day after a student eligible to 12 challenge courses under (e) of this section enrolls in a school, the school district shall 13 inform the department of the student's enrollment and provide notice to the student's 14 parent or guardian of the student's opportunity to challenge courses under (e) of this 15 section. Not later than three business days after receiving notice from the school 16 district, the department shall provide notice to the student's parent or guardian of the 17 student's opportunity to challenge courses under (e) of this section. The notices 18 required under this subsection may be in physical or electronic form. 19 * Sec. 4. AS 14.03.080(e) is amended to read: 20 (e) A child under school age shall be admitted to school in the district of 21 which the child is a resident if, immediately before the child became a resident of the 22 district, the child was legally enrolled in 23 (1) the public schools of another district or state; or 24 (2) a Department of Defense Education Activity or other publicly 25 funded kindergarten program in a military installation. 26 * Sec. 5. AS 14.60.010 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 27 (11) "military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, yard, 28 center, homeport facility for a ship, armory, or other installation under the jurisdiction 29 of the United States Department of Defense or the United States Coast Guard. 30 * Sec. 6. AS 14.03.080(g)(2) is repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.